California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(1) The Franchise Tax Board shall waive all unpaid penalties and fees imposed by this part for each taxable year for which tax amnesty is allowed, but only to the extent of the amount of any penalty or fee that is owed as a result of previous nonreporting or underreporting of tax liabilities or prior nonpayment of any taxes previously assessed or proposed to be assessed for
 that taxable year.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no criminal action shall be brought against the taxpayer for the taxable years for which tax amnesty is allowed for the nonreporting or underreporting of tax liabilities or the nonpayment of any taxes previously assessed or proposed to be assessed.

(b) This chapter shall not apply to violations of this part, for which, as of February 1, 2005, any of the following applies:

(1) The taxpayer is on notice of a criminal investigation by a complaint having been filed against the taxpayer.

(2) The taxpayer is under criminal investigation.

(3) A court proceeding has already been initiated.

(c) This section shall not apply to any nonreported or underreported tax liability amounts attributable to tax shelter items that could have been reported under either the voluntary compliance initiative under Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 19751) or the Internal Revenue Service’s Offshore Voluntary Compliance Initiative described in Revenue Procedure 2003–11.

(d) No refund or credit shall be granted with respect to any penalty or fee paid with respect to a taxable year prior to the time the taxpayer makes a request for tax amnesty for that taxable year pursuant to Section 19733.

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301), a taxpayer may not file a claim for refund or credit for any amounts paid in connection with the tax amnesty program under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 398, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19733.

(a) This chapter shall apply to any taxpayer who satisfies all of the following requirements:

(1) During the tax amnesty program period specified in Section 19731, is eligible to participate in the tax amnesty program.

(2) During the tax amnesty program period specified in Section 19731, files a completed amnesty application with the Franchise Tax Board, signed under penalty of perjury, electing to participate
 in the tax amnesty program.

(3) Within 60 days after the conclusion of the tax amnesty period, does the following:

(A) (i) For any taxable year eligible for the tax amnesty program where the taxpayer has not filed any required return, files a completed original tax return for that year, or

(ii) For any taxable year eligible for the tax amnesty program where the taxpayer filed a return but underreported tax liability on that return, files an amended return for that year.

(B) Pays in full any taxes and interest due for each taxable year described in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A), as applicable, for which amnesty is requested, or applies for an installment payment agreement under subdivision (b). For taxpayers who have not
 paid in full any taxes previously proposed to be assessed, pays in full the taxes and interest due for that portion of the proposed assessment for each taxable year for which amnesty is requested or applies for an installment payment agreement under subdivision (b).

(4) For purposes of complying with the full payment provisions of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), if the full amount due is paid within the period set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 19101 after the date the Franchise Tax Board mails a notice resulting from the filing of an amnesty application or the full amount is paid within 60 days after the conclusion of the tax amnesty period, the full amount due shall be treated as paid during the amnesty period.

(5) In the case of any taxpayer that has filed for bankruptcy protection under Title 11 of the United States Code, submits an order from a Federal
 Bankruptcy Court allowing the taxpayer to participate in the amnesty program.

(b) (1) For purposes of complying with the full payment provisions of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), the Franchise Tax Board may enter into an installment payment agreement, but only if final payment under the terms of that installment payment agreement is due and is paid no later than June 30, 2006.

(2) Any installment payment agreement authorized by this subdivision shall include interest on the outstanding amount due at the rate prescribed in Section 19521.

(3) Failure by the taxpayer to fully comply with the terms of an installment payment agreement under this subdivision shall render the waiver of penalties and fees under Section 19732 null and void, unless the Franchise Tax Board determines
 that the failure was due to reasonable cause and not due to willful neglect.

(4) In the case of any failure described under paragraph (3), the total amount of tax, interest, fees, and all penalties shall become immediately due and payable.

(c) (1) The application required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, but in no case shall a mere payment of any taxes and interest due, in whole or in part, for any taxable year otherwise eligible for amnesty under this part, be deemed to constitute an acceptable amnesty application under this part. For purposes of the prior sentence, the application of a refund from one taxable year to offset a tax liability from another taxable year otherwise eligible for amnesty shall not, without the filing of an amnesty application, be deemed to constitute an
 acceptable amnesty application under this part.

(2) The Legislature specifically intends that the Franchise Tax Board, in administering the amnesty application requirement under this part, make the amnesty application process as streamlined as possible to ensure participation in the amnesty program will be available to as many taxpayers as possible without otherwise compromising the Franchise Tax Board’s ability to enforce and collect the taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(d) Upon the conclusion of the tax amnesty program period, the Franchise Tax Board may propose a deficiency upon any return filed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), impose penalties and fees, or initiate criminal action under this part with respect to the difference between the amount shown on that return and the
 correct amount of tax. This action shall not invalidate any waivers previously granted under Section 19732.

(e) All revenues derived pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be subject to Sections 19602 and 19604.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 398, Sec. 5.   Effective September 29, 2005.   Applicable as provided in Sec. 10 of Ch. 398.)
-------------------------------------------

19734.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if any overpayment of tax shown on an original or amended return filed under this article is refunded or credited within 180 days after the return is filed, no interest shall be allowed under Section 19340 on that overpayment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 11.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19735.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may issue forms, instructions, notices, rules, or guidelines, and take any other necessary actions, needed to implement this chapter, specifically including any forms, instructions, notices, rules, or guidelines that specify the form and manner of any acceptable form of amnesty application described in Section 19733.

(b) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any
 standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 11.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19736.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall conduct a public outreach program and adequately publicize the tax amnesty program so as to maximize public awareness and to make taxpayers aware of the program. In addition, the Franchise Tax Board shall make taxpayers aware of the new and increased penalties associated with taxpayer failure to participate in the tax amnesty program.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall make reasonable efforts to identify taxpayer liabilities and, to the extent
 practicable, will send written notice to taxpayers of their eligibility for the tax amnesty program. However, failure of the Franchise Tax Board to notify a taxpayer of the existence or correct amount of a tax liability eligible for amnesty shall not preclude the taxpayer from participating in the tax amnesty program, nor shall such failure be grounds for abating the penalty imposed under Section 19777.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 11.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19738.

Any taxpayer who has an existing installment payment agreement under Section 19008 as of the start of the amnesty program, and who does not participate in the amnesty program, may not be subject to the penalty imposed under Section 19777.5 with respect to amounts payable under that agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 398, Sec. 7.   Effective September 29, 2005.   Applicable as provided in Sec. 10 of Ch. 398.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Tax Shelters [19751. - 19778.]



  ARTICLE 1. Voluntary Compliance Initiative One [19751. - 19754.]

19751.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall develop and administer a voluntary compliance initiative for taxpayers subject to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), as provided in this article.

(b) The voluntary compliance initiative shall be conducted during the period from January 1, 2004, to April 15, 2004, inclusive, pursuant to Section 19754. This
 initiative shall apply to tax liabilities attributable to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2003.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall issue forms and instructions and may take any other actions necessary, including the use of closing agreements, to implement this article.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall publicize the voluntary compliance initiative so as to maximize public awareness of and participation in the initiative. The Franchise Tax Board shall coordinate to the highest degree possible its publicity efforts and other actions taken in implementing this article.

(e) Any correspondence mailed by the Franchise Tax Board to a taxpayer at the taxpayer’s last known address outlining the voluntary compliance initiative under this article constitutes “contact”
 within the meaning of Treasury Regulation Section 1.6664-2(c)(3), relating to qualified amended returns, and paragraph (3) of the former subdivision (e) of Section 19773 and Section 19777.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 11.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19752.

Any taxpayer who meets the requirements of Section 19754 may elect the application of either, but not both, of the following:

(a) Voluntary compliance without appeal. If this option is elected, then each of the following shall apply:

(1) The Franchise Tax Board shall waive or abate all penalties imposed by this part, for all taxable years where the
 taxpayer elects to participate in the initiative, as a result of the underreporting of tax liabilities attributable to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions.

(2) Except as provided in Section 19753, no criminal action shall be brought against the taxpayer for the taxable years with respect to issues for which the taxpayer voluntarily complies under this article.

(3) No penalty may be waived or abated under this article if the penalty imposed is attributable to an assessment of taxes that became final prior to December 31, 2003.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301) of this part, the taxpayer may not file a claim for refund for the amounts paid in connection with abusive tax avoidance transactions under this article.

(b) Voluntary compliance with appeal. If this option is elected, then each of the following shall apply:

(1) The Franchise Tax Board shall waive or abate all penalties, except the accuracy related penalty under Section 19164 (as in effect immediately before enactment of the act adding this section), imposed by this part, for each of the taxable years for which the taxpayer elects to participate in the initiative, that are owed as a result of the underreporting of tax liabilities attributable to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions.

(2) Except as provided in Section 19753, no criminal action may be brought against the taxpayer for each of the taxable years for which the taxpayer voluntarily complies under this section.

(3) No penalty may be waived under this article if the penalty imposed is
 attributable to an assessment of taxes that became due and payable prior to December 31, 2003.

(4) The taxpayer may file a claim for refund under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301) of this part. Notwithstanding Section 19331, the taxpayer may not file an appeal to the board until after either of the following:

(A) The date the Franchise Tax Board takes action on the claim for refund for the tax year to which this article applies.

(B) The later of either of the following dates:

(i) The date that is 180 days after the date of a final determination by the Internal Revenue Service with respect to the transaction or transactions to which this article applies.

(ii) The date that is four
 years after the date the claim for refund was filed or one year after full payment of all tax, including penalty and interest was made, whichever date is later.

(5) The taxpayer shall be subject to the accuracy related penalty under Section 19164.

(A) The penalty may be assessed:

(i) When the Franchise Tax Board takes action on the claim for refund.

(ii) When a federal determination becomes final for the same issue, in which case the penalty shall be assessed (and may not be abated) if the penalty was assessed at the federal level.

(B) In determining the amount of the underpayment of tax, Treasury Regulation Section 1.6664-2(c)(2), as promulgated under Section 6664 of the Internal Revenue
 Code, relating to qualified amended returns, shall not apply. The amount of the underpayment is the difference between the amount of tax shown on the original return and the correct amount of tax for the taxable year. The underpayment amount shall not be less than the amount of the claim for refund filed by the taxpayer under paragraph (4) that was denied.

(C) The penalty is due and payable upon notice and demand pursuant to Section 19049. Only after the taxpayer has paid all amounts due, including the penalty, and the claim is denied in whole or in part, may the taxpayer file an appeal under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301), of this part in conjunction with the appeal filed under paragraph (4).

(c) A taxpayer’s election under this section shall be made for all taxable years of the taxpayer governed by this article. A separate election for each taxable year governed by
 this article is not allowed.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 13.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19753.

(a) This article does not apply to violations of this part for which, as of December 31, 2003, any of the following applies:

(1) A criminal complaint was filed against the taxpayer in connection with an abusive tax avoidance transaction or transactions.

(2) The taxpayer is the subject of a criminal investigation in connection with
 an abusive tax avoidance transaction or transactions.

(b) No refund or credit shall be granted with respect to any penalty paid prior to the time the taxpayer participates in the voluntary compliance initiative authorized by this article.

(c) For purposes of this article, an “abusive tax avoidance transaction” means a plan or arrangement devised for the principal purpose of avoiding tax. Abusive tax avoidance transactions include, but are not limited to, “listed transactions” as described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 18407.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 15.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19754.

(a) The voluntary compliance initiative described in this article applies to any taxpayer who was not eligible to participate in the Internal Revenue Service’s Offshore Voluntary Compliance Initiative described in Revenue Procedure 2003–11, and during the period from January 1, 2004, to April 15, 2004, does both of the following:

(1) Files an amended tax return under this part for each taxable
 year for which the taxpayer has previously filed a tax return using an abusive tax avoidance transaction to underreport the taxpayer’s tax liability for that taxable year. Each amended return shall report all income from all sources, without regard to the abusive tax avoidance transaction.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), pays in full all taxes and interest due.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may enter into an installment payment agreement in lieu of the full payment required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). Any installment payment agreement authorized by this subdivision shall include interest on the unpaid amount at the rate prescribed in Section 19521. Failure by the taxpayer to fully comply with the terms of the installment payment agreement shall render the waiver of penalties null and void, and the total amount of tax, interest, and all penalties shall be
 immediately due and payable.

(c) After April 15, 2004, the Franchise Tax Board may issue a deficiency assessment upon an amended return filed pursuant to subdivision (a), impose penalties, or initiate criminal action under this part with respect to the difference between the amount shown on that return and the correct amount of tax. This action shall not invalidate any waivers granted under Section 19752.

(d) In addition to any other authority to examine returns, for the purpose of improving state tax administration, the Franchise Tax Board may inquire into the facts and circumstances related to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions to underreport the tax liabilities for which a taxpayer has participated in the voluntary compliance initiative under this article. Taxpayers shall cooperate fully with inquiries described in this subdivision. Failure by a taxpayer to fully
 cooperate in an inquiry described in this subdivision shall render the waiver of penalties under this article null and void and the taxpayer may be assessed any penalties that may apply.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 17.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Statute of Limitations for Abusive Tax Avoidance Transactions [19755. - 19755.]

19755.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 19057, and except as provided in paragraph (2), with respect to proposed deficiency assessments related to an abusive tax avoidance transaction, a notice of a proposed deficiency assessment may be mailed to the taxpayer within eight years after the return was filed, or within the period otherwise provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of Chapter 4 of this part, whichever expires later.

(2) For notices mailed on or after August 1, 2011, with respect to proposed deficiency assessments related to an abusive tax avoidance transaction, a notice of a proposed deficiency assessment may be mailed to the taxpayer within 12 years after the return was filed, or within the period otherwise provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of Chapter 4 of this part, whichever expires later.

(b) This section shall apply to any return filed under this part on or after January 1, 2000. Paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall apply to taxable years that have not been closed by a statute of limitations, res judicata, or otherwise, as of August 1, 2011.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 20.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Voluntary Compliance Initiative Two [19761. - 19764.]

19761.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall develop and administer a voluntary compliance initiative for taxpayers subject to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), as provided in this article.

(b) The voluntary compliance initiative shall be conducted during the period from August 1, 2011, to October 31, 2011, inclusive, pursuant to Section 19764. This
 initiative shall apply to tax liabilities attributable to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions and to unreported income from the use of offshore financial arrangements for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2011.

(c) The Franchise Tax Board shall issue forms and instructions and may take any other actions necessary, including the use of closing agreements, to implement this article.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall publicize the voluntary compliance initiative so as to maximize public awareness of and participation in the initiative. The Franchise Tax Board shall coordinate to the highest degree possible its publicity efforts and other actions taken in implementing this article.

(e) Any correspondence mailed by the Franchise Tax Board to a taxpayer at the taxpayer’s last known address outlining the
 voluntary compliance initiative under this article constitutes “contact” within the meaning of Treasury Regulation Section 1.6664-2(c)(3), relating to qualified amended returns, and Sections 19164.5 and 19777.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 21.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19762.

(a) Any taxpayer who meets the requirements of Section 19764 may elect to participate in the voluntary compliance initiative under this article.

(b) For taxpayers electing to participate in the voluntary compliance initiative under this article, all of the following shall apply:

(1) (A) Except as provided in
 subparagraph (B), the Franchise Tax Board shall waive or abate all penalties imposed by this part, for all taxable years where the taxpayer elects to participate in the initiative, as a result of the unreported tax liabilities attributable to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions and to unreported income from the use of offshore financial arrangements.

(B) The penalties imposed under Section 19138 or 19777.5 may not be waived.

(2) Except as provided in Section 19763, no criminal action shall be brought against the taxpayer for the taxable years with respect to issues for which the taxpayer voluntarily complies under this article.

(3) No penalty assessed after July 31, 2011, may be waived or abated under this article if the penalty imposed is attributable to an assessment of taxes that became final prior to
 July 31, 2011. For purposes of this paragraph, assessment of taxes does not include taxes self-assessed on an original or amended return filed before August 1, 2011.

(4) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301) of this part, no refund or credit shall be allowed for amounts paid in connection with abusive tax avoidance transactions or unreported income from the use of offshore financial arrangements under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 21.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19763.

(a) This article does not apply to violations of this part for which, as of July 31, 2011, any of the following applies:

(1) A criminal complaint was filed against the taxpayer in connection with an abusive tax avoidance transaction, transactions, or unreported income from the use of an offshore financial arrangement or arrangements.

(2) The taxpayer is the subject of a criminal investigation in connection with an abusive tax avoidance transaction, transactions, or unreported income from the use of an offshore financial arrangement or arrangements.

(b) No refund or credit shall be allowed with respect to any penalty paid prior to the time the taxpayer participates in the voluntary compliance initiative authorized by this article.

(c) For purposes of this article, an “abusive tax avoidance transaction” has the same meaning as in Section 19777, as amended by the act adding this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 21.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19764.

(a) The voluntary compliance initiative described in this article applies to any taxpayer who, during the period from August 1, 2011, to October 31, 2011, makes an election as described in Section 19762 and does both of the following:

(1) (A) Files an amended tax return under this part for each taxable year for which the taxpayer has previously filed a tax return using an
 abusive tax avoidance transaction or an offshore financial arrangement to underreport the taxpayer’s tax liability for that taxable year or failed to include income from the offshore financial arrangement. Each amended return shall report all income from all sources, without regard to the abusive tax avoidance transaction, including all income from offshore financial arrangements. No deduction shall be allowed for transaction costs associated with an abusive tax avoidance transaction or for transaction or other costs associated with unreported income from the use of an offshore financial arrangement.

(B) For purposes of this article, an “offshore financial arrangement” means any transaction involving financial arrangements that in any manner rely on the use of offshore payment cards, including credit, debit, or charge cards, issued by banks in foreign jurisdictions or offshore financial arrangements, including arrangements with foreign banks,
 financial institutions, corporations, partnerships, trusts, or other entities to avoid or evade income or franchise tax.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (b), pays in full all taxes and interest due.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may enter into an installment payment agreement in lieu of the full payment required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), but only if final payment under the terms of that installment payment agreement is due and paid no later than June 15, 2012. Any installment payment agreement authorized by this subdivision shall include interest on the unpaid amount at the rate prescribed in Section 19521. Failure by the taxpayer to fully comply with the terms of the installment payment agreement shall render the waiver of penalties null and void, and the total amount of tax, interest, and all penalties shall be immediately due and payable.

(c) After October 31, 2011, the Franchise Tax Board may issue a deficiency assessment upon an amended return filed pursuant to subdivision (a), impose penalties, or initiate criminal action under this part with respect to the difference between the amount shown on that return and the correct amount of tax. This action shall not invalidate any waivers granted under Section 19762.

(d) In addition to any other authority to examine returns, for the purpose of improving state tax administration, the Franchise Tax Board may inquire into the facts and circumstances related to the use of abusive tax avoidance transactions or offshore financial arrangements to underreport the tax liabilities for which a taxpayer has participated in the voluntary compliance initiative under this article. Taxpayers shall cooperate fully with inquiries described in this subdivision. Failure by a taxpayer to
 fully cooperate in an inquiry described in this subdivision shall render the waiver of penalties under this article null and void and the taxpayer may be assessed any penalties that may apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 21.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Penalties and Interest [19772. - 19778.]

19772.

(a) Section 6707A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to penalty for failure to include reportable transaction information with a return, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) (1) Section 6707A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amount of penalty, is modified by substituting the phrase “or
 which would have resulted from such transaction if such transaction were respected for state tax purposes” for the phrase “or which would have resulted from such transaction if such transaction were respected for Federal tax purposes.”

(2) The penalty amounts in Section 6707A(b)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code are modified by substituting “$30,000 ($15,000” for “$200,000 ($100,000.”

(3) The penalty amounts in Section 6707A(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code are modified by substituting “$15,000 ($5,000” for “$50,000 ($10,000.”

(4) The penalty amounts in Section 6707A(b)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to minimum penalty, are modified by substituting “$2,500 ($1,250” for “$10,000 ($5,000.”

(c) (1) Section 6707A(c)(1)
 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reportable transaction, is modified to include reportable transactions within the meaning of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 18407.

(2) Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to listed transaction, is modified to include listed transactions within the meaning of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 18407.

(d) The penalty under this section only applies to taxpayers with taxable income greater than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(e) Section 6707A(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to a penalty reported to the Securities and Exchange Commission, does not apply.

(f) Section 6707A(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to authority to rescind penalty, does
 not apply, and in lieu thereof, the following apply:

(1) The Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board may rescind all or any portion of any penalty imposed by this section with respect to any violation if all of the following apply:

(A) The violation is with respect to a reportable transaction other than a listed transaction.

(B) The person on whom the penalty is imposed has a history of complying with the requirements of this part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(C) It is shown that the violation is due to an unintentional mistake of fact.

(D) Imposing the penalty would be against equity and good conscience.

(E) Rescinding the penalty would promote compliance with the requirements of this part and Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and effective tax administration.

(2) The exercise of authority under paragraph (1) shall be at the sole discretion of the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board and may not be delegated.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any determination under this subdivision may not be reviewed in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(g) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of Chapter 4, relating to deficiency assessments, does not apply with respect to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed under this section.

(h) The penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any penalty imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(i) The amendments made to this section by Section 25 of Chapter 359 of the Statutes of 2015 apply to penalties assessed on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 288.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19774.

(a) If a taxpayer has a noneconomic substance transaction understatement for any taxable year, there shall be added to the tax an amount equal to 40 percent of the amount of that understatement.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) shall be applied by substituting “20 percent” for “40 percent” with respect to the portion of any
 noneconomic substance transaction understatement with respect to which the relevant facts affecting the tax treatment of the item are adequately disclosed in the return or a statement attached to the return.

(2) For taxable years beginning before January 1, 2003, “adequately disclosed” includes the disclosure of the tax shelter identification number on the taxpayer’s return as required by subdivision (c) of Section 18628, as applicable for the year in which the transaction was entered into.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) The term “noneconomic substance transaction understatement” means any amount which would be an understatement under Section 6662A(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by subdivision (b) of Section 19164.5 if Section 6662A(b) of the Internal Revenue Code were applied by taking into
 account items attributable to noneconomic substance transactions rather than items to which Section 6662A(b) applies.

(2) A “noneconomic substance transaction” includes:

(A) The disallowance of any loss, deduction or credit, or addition to income attributable to a determination that the disallowance or addition is attributable to a transaction or arrangement that lacks economic substance including a transaction or arrangement in which an entity is disregarded as lacking economic substance. A transaction shall be treated as lacking economic substance if the taxpayer does not have a valid nontax California business purpose for entering into the transaction.

(B) Any disallowance of claimed tax benefits by reason of a transaction lacking economic substance, within the meaning of Section 7701(o) of the Internal Revenue
 Code, relating to clarification of economic substance doctrine, as added by Section 1409(a) of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), except as otherwise provided.

(i) For purposes of this subparagraph, the phrase “apart from state income tax effects” shall be substituted for the phrase “apart from Federal income tax effects” in each place it appears in Section 7701(o)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) For purposes of this subparagraph, the phrase “any federal or local income tax effect which is related to a state income tax effect shall be treated in the same manner as a state income tax effect” is substituted for the phrase “any State or local income tax effect which is related to a Federal income tax effect shall be treated in the same manner as a Federal income tax effect” in Section 7701(o)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) (1) If the notice of proposed assessment of additional tax has been sent with respect to a penalty to which this section applies, only the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board may compromise all or any portion of that penalty.

(2) The exercise of authority under paragraph (1) shall be at the sole discretion of the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board and may not be delegated.

(3) Notwithstanding any other law or rule of law, any determination under this subdivision may not be reviewed in any administrative or judicial proceeding.

(e) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, if a penalty has been assessed for federal income tax purposes pursuant to Section 6662(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, as added
 by Section 1409(b) of the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152), on an underpayment attributable to the disallowance of claimed tax benefits by reason of a transaction lacking economic substance, then a penalty shall be imposed under this section for that portion of an understatement attributable to that transaction, and shall not be abated unless the taxpayer can establish that the imposition of the federal penalty under Section 6662 of the Internal Revenue Code for an underpayment attributable to that transaction was clearly erroneous.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to notices mailed on or after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 14, Sec. 23.   (SB 86)   Effective March 24, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19777.

(a) If a taxpayer has been contacted by the Franchise Tax Board regarding an abusive tax avoidance transaction, and has a deficiency attributable to an abusive tax avoidance transaction, there shall be added to the tax an amount equal to 100 percent of the interest payable under Section 19101 for the period beginning on the last date prescribed by law for the payment of that tax, determined without regard to extensions, and ending on the date the notice of proposed assessment is mailed.

(b) For purposes of this section, “abusive tax avoidance transaction” means any of the following:

(1) A tax shelter as defined in Section
 6662(d)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reduction not to apply to tax shelters. For purposes of this chapter, Section 6662(d)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting the phrase “income or franchise tax” for “Federal income tax.”

(2) A reportable transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reportable transaction, with respect to which the requirements of Section 6664(d)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code are not met.

(3) A listed transaction, as defined in Section 6707A(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to listed transaction.

(4) A gross misstatement, within the meaning of Section 6404(g)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue
 Code.

(5) Any transaction to which Section 19774 applies.

(c) The penalty imposed by this section is in addition to any other penalty imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(d) (1) If a taxpayer files an amended return reporting an abusive tax avoidance transaction, described in subdivision (b), after the taxpayer is contacted by the Franchise Tax Board regarding that abusive tax avoidance transaction but before a notice of proposed assessment is issued under Section 19033, then the amount of the penalty under this section shall be 50 percent of the interest payable under Section 19101 with respect to the amount of any additional tax
 reflected in the amended return attributable to that abusive tax avoidance transaction.

(2) If a notice of proposed assessment under Section 19033, with respect to an abusive tax avoidance transaction as described in subdivision (a), is issued after the amended return described in paragraph (1) is filed, the penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be applicable to the additional tax reflected in the notice of proposed assessment attributable to that abusive tax avoidance transaction in excess of the additional tax shown on the amended return.

(e) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 14 of the Statutes of 2011 shall apply to notices mailed on or after the effective date of that act and to amended returns filed more than 90 days after that effective date with
 respect to taxable years for which the statute of limitations for mailing a notice of proposed assessment has not expired as of that date.
